District of Columbia statutes.
14-701

Presumption of death.

If a person leaves his domicile without a known intention of changing it, and does not return or is not heard from for seven years from the time of his so leaving, he shall be presumed to be dead in any case where his death is in question, unless proof is made that he was alive within that time.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 522, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Administration of estates of absentees and absconders, see § 21-1901 et seq.
Death certificates where death presumed, see § 7-211.
This section is referenced in § 7-211, § 14-702, § 19-505, and § 47-1002.
1981 Ed., § 14-701.
1973 Ed., § 14-701.